Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-207
Attorney General; actions involving use of waters of interstate streams; duty.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General of the state to commence, prosecute and defend any and all actions affecting the rights of Nebraska water users in interstate streams as against appropriators in any other state, and to take such steps as in his judgment are required to protect any and all interests of appropriators of water within this state in such cases.

Laws 1915, c. 223, § 1, p. 492;

C.S.1922, § 4841;

C.S.1929, § 84-208;

R.S.1943, § 84-207.

Attorney General was authorized to maintain action to compel irrigation district to refrain from using water for irrigation purposes without complying with statute regulating same. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Mitchell Irrigation District, 129 Neb. 586, 262 N.W. 543 (1935).